Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.422

Graduate scholarships for engineering research—Studies published—Direction of program—Qualifications for candidates.

The studies and results of such scholarships shall be published as bulletins or engineering reports of the college of engineering of the university and a reasonable number of copies thereof shall be available to the public without cost. The provisions of RCW 28B.20.420 and this section shall include the cost of individual scholarships, the cost of necessary supplies and materials to be utilized, and the cost of printing and distribution of the bulletins or engineering reports. The direction of this research program shall rest in the proper department or departments and schools of the engineering college of the university and the candidates must meet the qualifications of the graduate school of the university for graduate students.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.422. Prior: 1945 c 241 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.77.225; 28.77.220, part.]